North Carolina, session 2025, SB780.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of forty-eight million dollars
($48,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to be used to increase the Medicaid rates paid for primary care services.
SECTION 1.(b) The rate increases required by this section shall be implemented as
soon as practicable after July 1, 2026, and shall apply to primary care services as defined by the
North Carolina Primary Care Payment Reform Task Force in its April 17, 2024, report to the
North Carolina General Assembly.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S780-v-1*